Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska70-623.02
Audit; records accessible to auditor.

The audit required by section 70-623 shall be made at the close of the fiscal year. The person making the audit shall have access to all books, records, vouchers, papers, contracts, or other data containing information on the subject (1) in the office of the public power or public power and irrigation district, (2) in the office of the chief executive officer of the district provided for in section 70-620.01, or (3) in the possession or under the control of any of the officers, agents, or servants of the district. All officers, agents, and servants of the public power or public power and irrigation district shall furnish to the person making the audit and his or her agents, servants, and employees such information regarding the auditing of the public power or public power and irrigation districts as may be demanded.

Laws 1943, c. 146, § 2(3), p. 521;

R.S.1943, § 70-623.02;

Laws 1944, Spec. Sess., c. 5, § 1(11), p. 109;

Laws 1991, LB 3, § 2;

Laws 1993, LB 310, § 9.